src/scripts/Spanish/date.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Date support for Spanish with documentation
# Writen by Matthew C.
# The format is: DD/MM/YYYY (or DD/MM/AAAA in Spanish)
# Note: date fsts or fomas can be adapted to your preferred date format for another language, but here we 
# are demonstrating how to do in Spanish. Also, please note that you will need to specify your date format 
# in the tokenizer, placing it in the future tokenization type called date, so the date FST can run in 
# these cases when a date is found according to your language.
# In this case, the separator is / (slash) that helps to identify and translate a date.
define NZDig 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Dig %0|NZDig ; 
define Year [Dig^<4] ; 
# The following conditions is for a new tokenization type, date:
#define Month [Dig^<2] ; 
#define Day [Dig^<2] ; 
# Here, we will indicate translations for each month.
define date 
01:enero | 
02:febrero | 
03:marzo | 
04:abril | 
05:mayo | 
06:junio | 
07:julio | 
08:agosto | 
09:septiembre | 
10:octubre | 
11:noviembre | 
12:diciembre ; 
define separator %/ ; 
# 12 months:
define months 01|02|03|04|05|06|07|08|09|10|11|12 ; 
# Up to 31 days:
define days months|13|14|15|16|17|18|19|20|21|22|23|24|25|26|27|28|29|30|31 ; 

define DateRule 
# Convert months to words.
date -> || days separator _ separator Year ,, 
# In Spanish, convert the last slash (separator) to del. Del 2024.
separator -> del || .#. days separator months _ ,, 
# And convert the first separator to de. 2 de febrero.
separator -> de || .#. days _ ,, 
# And when a day starts with 01, convert it to primero.
[01] -> primero || .#. _ ; 
# Finally, we have a date support.
regex DateRule ; 
